apertium-da-nb.da.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 3
	Entries: 11111
	Sdefs: 70
	Paradigms: 396
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools merge-morph apertium-da-nb.da.dix /Users/jonasfromseier/apertiumBuild/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.da.dix apertium-merged-da.dix -debug

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÅÆÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖØÙÚÛÜàáâäåæçèéêëìíîïñòóôöøùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np" 	c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="ut" 	c="Common gender (utrum)"/>
    <sdef n="nt" 	c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="un" 	c="Common and neuter"/>
    <sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="mf" 	c="Masculine / feminine"/>
    <sdef n="top" 	c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant" 	c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog" 	c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="al" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular and plural"/>
    <sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="def" 	c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="ind" 	c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="qnt" 	c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="itg" 	c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="dem" 	c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="ord" 	c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="nom" 	c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="gen" 	c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="vblex" 	c="Lexical (normal) verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod" 	c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="vaux" 	c="Auxiliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbser" 	c="'To be' verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver" 	c="'To have' verb"/>
    <sdef n="actv" 	c="Active voice"/>
    <sdef n="pasv" 	c="Passive voice"/>
    <sdef n="pres" 	c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="past" 	c="Past"/>
    <sdef n="imp" 	c="Imperfect"/>
    <sdef n="inf" 	c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="pp" 	c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="pprs" 	c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="part" 	c="infinitive participle"/>
    <sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="rel" 	c="Relative pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="ref" 	c="Reflexive pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="acc" 	c="Object"/>
    <sdef n="det" />
    <sdef n="p1" 	c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2" 	c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3" 	c="Third person"/>
    <sdef n="pos" 	c="Possesive"/>
    <sdef n="pst" 	c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp" 	c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup" 	c="Superlative"/>
    <sdef n="ssup" 	c="Super-superlative"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv" />
    <sdef n="pr" 	c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="ij" 	c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="num" 	c="Numbers"/>
    <sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="preadv" 	c="Preadverbial"/>
    <sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="pas" 	c="Passive"/>
    <sdef n="sent" 	c="End of sentence"/>
    <sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis ("/>
    <sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis )"/>
    <sdef n="abbr" 	c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="pers" 	c="Personal Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="compound-only-L" 	c="May only be the left-side of a compound"/>
    <sdef n="compound-R" 	c="May be the right-side of a compound, or a full word"/>
    <sdef n="cmp" 	c="Generation only: added by transfer to say we have a compound"/>
    <sdef n="cmp-split" 	c="Left part of a split compound"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

    <!-- Punctuation -->

<pardef n="numeros">

  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>mm</l><r><b/>mm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>cm</l><r><b/>cm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>km</l><r><b/>km<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <!-- separate out the number 1 as singular (fortunately "1.00" is usually plural!) -->
  <e>       <re>1</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[02-9]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9][.,][0-9]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[½¹²³¼¾]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="separa">
  <e>       <p><l>..</l>        <r>..<s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>...</l>       <r>...<s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[.\?;:!…¿¶]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


    <!-- Numerals -->

<pardef n="en__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="et__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="to__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


    <!-- Adjectives -->



<pardef n="finansiel__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>lere</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>leste</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lest</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="øvrig__adj"> <!-- This is broken, should be det.ind, but then we have problems in transfer -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="klar__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ere</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>este</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="nær__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>mere</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>meste</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mest</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="en">              <i>en</i><par n="en__num"/></e>
<e lm="et">              <i>et</i><par n="et__num"/></e>
<e lm="fem">             <i>fem</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="fire">            <i>fire</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="ni">              <i>ni</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="otte">            <i>otte</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="seks">            <i>seks</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="syv">             <i>syv</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="ti">              <i>ti</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="to">              <i>to</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="tre">             <i>tre</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="atten">           <i>atten</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="attende">         <i>attende</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="elleve">          <i>elleve</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="halvtreds">       <i>halvtreds</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="femten">          <i>femten</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="fjorten">         <i>fjorten</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="fjortende">       <i>fjortende</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="fyrre">           <i>fyrre</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="fyrretyvende">    <i>fyrretyvende</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="hundrede">        <i>hundrede</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="halvfems">        <i>halvfems</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="nitten">          <i>nitten</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="nul">             <i>nul</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="tres">            <i>tres</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="seksten">         <i>seksten</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="halvfjerds">      <i>halvfjerds</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="sytten">          <i>sytten</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="tolv">            <i>tolv</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="tredive">         <i>tredive</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="tretten">         <i>tretten</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="tredivte">        <i>tredivte</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="tusinde">         <i>tusinde</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="million">         <i>million</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="millionte">       <i>millionte</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="halvtredsindstyvende"><i>halvtredsindstyvende</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="halvfemsindstyvende"><i>halvfemsindstyvende</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="tresindstyvende"> <i>tresindstyvende</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="halvfjerdsindstyvende"><i>halvfjerdsindstyvende</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="finansiel">      <i>finansiel</i><par n="finansiel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nær">             <i>nær</i><par n="nær__adj"/></e>
<e lm="øvrig">           <i>øvrig</i><par n="øvrig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="klar">            <i>klar</i><par n="klar__adj"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
